Louisiana, session 2026, HB951.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1514(D)(4) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
23:2065(A)(12) through (17) and 2092(A)(3) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1514. Worker training fund; purpose; training programs; eligibility criteria;
program administration
* * *
D.
* * *
(4) No more than ten percent of such amounts appropriated to the fund by the
state legislature shall be used for the payment of expenses incurred for the
administration of this account. Expenses related to employer outreach and
engagement of the program are not considered administrative.
* * *
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 951 ENROLLED
§2065. Council duties and functions
A. The council shall do all of the following:
* * *
(12) Provide oversight to ensure the state's workforce programs and
resources are aligned to meet employer and labor market needs.
(13) Work to integrate other state agencies and workforce initiatives into a
coordinated system.
(14) Oversee the coordination of training programs and workforce funding
statewide.
(15) Ensure cooperation among agencies engaged in workforce training.
(16) Through the Business Workforce Committee, recommend performance
metrics for the Office of Business Workforce Solutions.
(17) Ensure that outcomes are result-oriented and tied to employer needs.
* * *
§2092. Organizational structure of standing committees
A.
* * *
(3)(a) The Business Workforce Committee shall be a committee of the
council.
(b) The Business Workforce Committee shall be composed of seven
members, with a majority of the members being business representatives and one
member being the secretary of Louisiana Economic Development, or their designees.
(c) The Business Workforce Committee shall do all of the following:
(i) Serve as the advisory committee to the Office of Business Workforce
Solutions.
(ii) Provide input on the annual plan of work of the Office of Business
Workforce Solutions.
(iii) Recommend candidates for the assistant secretary position within the
Office of Business Workforce Solutions to the secretary of Louisiana Works, which
shall be forwarded to the governor by the secretary for consideration.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 951 ENROLLED
(iv) Recommend performance metrics for the assistant secretary.
(v) Report annually to the council on the Office of Business Workforce
Solutions' results.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 36:308(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§308. Offices; purposes and functions
* * *
E.(1) The Office of Business Workforce Solutions herein referred to as "the
office" shall perform the functions of the state relating to business-related workforce
services, providing both strategy and coordination of state, regional, and local
workforce service providers across the state. The office shall manage business-
related programs including Business Services, the Incumbent Worker Training
Program, and federal funding related to layoff aversion and response, as well as other
business-related programs and funding administered by Louisiana Works to be
determined at the discretion of the secretary.
(2) The office shall perform all of the following functions of the state:
(a) Assisting businesses in accessing training resources and identifying
sources of talent from all local and statewide programs.
(b) Reviewing and mapping existing workforce programs statewide across
all agencies, schools, postsecondary education, apprenticeships, training programs,
nonprofits, and local and regional partners.
(c) Coordinating state agencies to ensure high quality, integrated regional
workforce solutions are provided and taking into account the separate roles and
responsibilities of each agency.
(d) Coordinating workforce services on a statewide and regional basis.
(e) Managing federal and state workforce development funds to support
business needs in high-demand, high-salary jobs and priority industry sectors.
(f) Aligning state and regional workforce development services with state
and regional economic development goals.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 951 ENROLLED
(g) Building customized workforce solutions for new and existing
companies, in partnership with state departments, educational institutions, and other
governmental and nongovernmental institutions and organizations.
(h) Assisting businesses in building talent pipelines through middle school
career exposure, high school internship and apprenticeship, registered
apprenticeship, college internships, and pre-employment recruitment and training.
(i) Developing industry-specific training partnerships.
(j) Expanding work-based learning including apprenticeship programs.
(k) Promulgating rules and regulations.
(l) Providing financial oversight of workforce development programs.
(m) Developing operational policies subject to oversight from the secretary
and the Business Workforce Committee.
(n) Entering into contracts and agreements.
(o) Accepting grants, donations, and other funding resources.
(p) Coordinating with economic development organizations, agencies, and
education providers.
(q) Providing regular workforce development reports including performance
data and economic impact analysis.
(r) Entering into non-disclosure agreements when it involves proprietary or
confidential information related to economic development projects.
(s) Linking talent development to business recruitment, retention, and
expansion.
Section 3. R.S. 39:1554(T) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1554. Application of this Chapter
* * *
T.(1) This Chapter shall not apply to Louisiana Economic Development;
however, Louisiana Economic Development shall be required to continue as a
LaGov agency and shall adopt procurement provisions pursuant to rules adopted in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The rules created by Louisiana
Economic Development pursuant to this Subsection shall be subject to the approval
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 951 ENROLLED
of the commissioner of administration before they are sent to committees required
for review of agency rules in R.S. 49:966(B)(1). In addition, the House Committee
on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance shall also have authority
for review of agency rules as provided in R.S. 49:950 et seq.
(2) At the discretion of the secretary of Louisiana Works, this Chapter shall
not apply to the Office of Business Workforce Solutions within Louisiana Works;
however, the Office of Business Workforce Solutions shall be required to continue
as an office within Louisiana Works and shall adopt procurement provisions
pursuant to rules adopted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The
rules created by the Office of Business Workforce Solutions pursuant to this
Subsection shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner of administration
before the rules are sent to committees required by R.S. 49:966(B)(1). In addition,
the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance shall
have the authority to review any rules in accordance with R.S. 49:950 et seq.
* * *
Section 4. It is the intent of the legislature to create a new office within Louisiana
Works, which shall be known as the Office of Business Workforce Solutions, for the purpose
of performing functions of the state relating to business workforce solutions under the
guidance and oversight of the secretary of Louisiana Works. The Office of Business
Workforce Solutions shall serve as the primary office for business-related workforce
solutions and development, managing funding and programs, and providing both strategy
and coordination of state, regional, and local workforce service providers across the state.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.